Illinois, session 104th, HB2555.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Support for Family Home Health Aides and Caregivers Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The home health workforce is facing a 7significant shortage of direct care workers, including home 8health aides, personal care aides, and private duty nurses. In 9addition to a shortage of direct care workers, the demand for 10private duty nursing services remains high due to an 11increasing desire for individuals to receive care in their 12community rather than in an institutionalized setting. As a 13result of fewer available workers and long waitlists because 14of a high demand for services, many families are turning to 15parent caregivers to fill the gap in care, who play a crucial 16role in providing care for loved ones who are medically frail. 17While parent and family caregivers serve an important role in 18providing needed care, private duty nursing services require 19nurses with proper education, licensing, and credentials that 20allow for the highest standard of care in the home.21    The purpose of this Act is to establish a Family Home 22Health Aide Program to train a parent, guardian, or family 23member in providing certain home health aide and private duty   HB2555- 2 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1nursing services to relatives, by consanguinity or 2affiliation, to ensure access to high-quality care for 3medically frail Medicaid beneficiaries who choose to receive 4such services in their community. Importantly, the Family Home 5Health Aide Program is intended to supplement the State's 6existing private duty nursing workforce and increase access to 7private duty nursing services for medically frail individuals 8of any age who require a higher acuity of care than what may be 9safely provided by a parent or family caregiver. This Act 10outlines requirements that the State will follow in:11        (1) establishing the training and certification of 12    parent or family caregivers, known as family home health 13    aides;14        (2) defining the services that family home health 15    aides may provide under the State's Medicaid program;16        (3) establishing competitive reimbursement rates while 17    ensuring that residents of the State are not deterred from 18    pursuing careers in private duty nursing or as a home 19    health aide; 20        (4) establishing clinical supervision requirements for 21    medically frail Medicaid beneficiaries receiving qualified 22    home health services by ensuring they receive such 23    services from family members employed by the same agency 24    to ensure continuity of care;25        (5) developing a respite program; and 26        (6) establishing electronic visit verification and   HB2555- 3 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1    reporting requirements to deter fraud, waste, and abuse, 2    as well as collect metrics on the success of the Family 3    Home Health Aide Program. 4    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:5    "Approved training" means a course of training approved by 6the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, in 7consultation with, independent and State providers of private 8duty nursing services, other private duty nursing agencies, 9home care providers, patient advocacy groups, and other 10relevant stakeholders, to train a family caregiver as a family 11home health aide.12    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 13Services.14    "Designated home care provider" means a private duty 15nursing or home care provider who has been approved by the 16Department to participate in the Family Home Health Aide 17Program. 18    "Eligible relative" means an individual of any age who has 19an underlying physical, mental, or cognitive impairment that 20prevents such individual from safely living independently, is 21eligible to receive skilled care or respite care services 22under the State's Medicaid program, and is related to his or 23her family caregiver.24    "Family caregiver" means any parent, guardian, or family 25member related by consanguinity to the eligible relative, who:  HB2555- 4 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1        (i) is able to provide appropriate and consistent care 2    to an eligible relative based on physical proximity to the 3    eligible relative; and4        (ii) has the necessary physical and mental capacity to 5    assist the eligible relative with services provided under 6    the Family Home Health Aide Program.7    "Family home health aide" means any family caregiver who 8meets the training and certification requirements described in 9paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of Section 15 to 10provide services as a family home health aide under the 11State's Medicaid program. 12    "Home care provider" means a private duty nursing or home 13care provider who has been approved by the Department to 14participate in the Family Home Health Aide Program.15    "Program" means the Family Home Health Aide Program.16    "Respite care" means planned or emergency care provided to 17a medically fragile child or adult to provide temporary relief 18to the family caregiver of such child or adult.19    "State's Medicaid program" means the medical assistance 20program established and administered in Article V of the 21Illinois Public Aid Code as authorized under Section 1902 of 22the Social Security Act. 23    Section 15. Family Home Health Aide Program. 24    (a) Establishment.25        (1) In general. Not later than one year after the   HB2555- 5 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1    effective date of this Act, the Director of Healthcare and 2    Family Services shall establish a Family Home Health Aide 3    Program for the purposes of training a family caregiver of 4    an eligible relative on the provision of qualified home 5    health services to supplement home health and private duty 6    nursing services in the State. Under the Family Home 7    Health Aide Program, the Director must certify a family 8    caregiver of an eligible relative who has successfully 9    completed the approved training for family home health 10    aides, and meets all other applicable requirements 11    established by the State, and is determined to be in 12    compliance with any federal law concerning family home 13    health aides. Subject to federal approval by the Centers 14    for Medicare and Medicaid Services, a certified family 15    home health aide shall be eligible to provide qualified 16    home health services to an eligible relative under any 17    home and community-based services waiver program 18    authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security 19    Act. 20        (2) Training.21            (A) The Department, in consultation with 22        independent and State home care providers of private 23        duty nursing services, other private duty nursing 24        agencies, patient advocacy groups, and other relevant 25        stakeholders, shall develop requirements to train a 26        family caregiver as a family home health aide to   HB2555- 6 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1        provide qualified home health services to an eligible 2        relative pursuant to the relative's plan of care. A 3        family caregiver shall be required to be trained in 4        skills that are relevant or necessary to the eligible 5        relative pursuant to the relative's plan of care and 6        clinical acuity to become a family home health aide. 7        Such training and instruction may include:8                (i) patient care transfers;9                (ii) assistance with activities of daily 10            living;11                (iii) normal range of motion and position;12                (iv) adequate nutrition and fluid intake;13                (v) basic infection prevention and control 14            procedures;15                (vi) observation and reporting of a patient's 16            vital signs, blood pressure, and general patient 17            status;18                (vii) urinary catheterization and ostomy care;19                (viii) ambulation;20                (ix) adequate nutrition and fluid intake;21                (x) wound care;22                (xi) enteral care;23                (xii) medication administration; and24                (xiii) any additional requirements, including 25            mandated reporter responsibilities, determined by 26            the Department.  HB2555- 7 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1            (B) The Department shall offer the training, 2        including hands-on experience through the relevant 3        State agency, or may select designated home care 4        providers to provide the training described in 5        paragraph (A) to family caregivers of eligible 6        relatives for the purposes of becoming certified as a 7        family home health aide. If the Department selects the 8        option of utilizing designated home care providers to 9        provide the training, the Department must adequately 10        reimburse such designated providers for providing the 11        training to family caregivers of eligible relatives. 12        (3) Certification. The Department shall certify a 13    family caregiver of an eligible relative as a family home 14    health aide if the family caregiver: 15            (A) is at least 18 years of age;16            (B) has demonstrated a minimum capacity to read 17        and write;18            (C) has successfully completed the training 19        described in paragraph (2) and any additional 20        education or competency requirements established by 21        the Department; and22            (D) has successfully fulfilled any additional 23        requirements as established by the Department.24    (b) Employment.25        (1) In general. A home care provider may employ a 26    family home health aide to provide qualified home health   HB2555- 8 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1    services to an eligible relative under the program. 2    However, the State shall not require a home care provider 3    to participate in the program.4        (2) Supervision. The home care provider shall ensure 5    that a family home health aide employed by the provider 6    receives appropriate clinical supervision, at least every 7    90 days or in accordance with State law, and based on the 8    acuity level of the eligible relative, which may be 9    determined using the optional acuity tool developed under 10    subsection (e). 11    (c) Services.12        (1) In general. Subject to federal approval by the 13    Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and the 14    limitations described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, 15    the family caregiver qualified as a family home health 16    aide under this program shall be eligible to provide 17    qualified home health services to eligible relatives under 18    Illinois' Medicaid State Plan or any home and 19    community-based services waiver program. Such services 20    shall include care relating to:21            (A) activities of daily living, including personal 22        care;23            (B) mobility;24            (C) nutrition and hydration;25            (D) toileting and elimination;26            (E) assistive devices;  HB2555- 9 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1            (F) safety and cleanliness;2            (G) reporting abnormal signs and symptoms;3            (H) cardiopulmonary resuscitation and emergency 4        care;5            (I) infection control;6            (J) hygiene, grooming, skin care, and pressure 7        sore prevention;8            (K) wound care;9            (L) portable oxygen use and safety and other 10        respiratory procedures;11            (M) enteral care and therapy; and12            (N) any other services appropriate for low acuity 13        eligible relatives.14        (2) Limitation on services.15            (A) A family home health aide shall only provide 16        qualified home health services to an eligible relative 17        pursuant to the relative's plan of care and only while 18        actively employed by a home care provider. A family 19        home health aide may not provide qualified home health 20        services to an eligible relative under this program 21        unless such family caregiver has been certified and 22        received the state-required training in such services.23            (B) The services received under this program by an 24        eligible relative from a home health aide shall not 25        exceed 40 hours per week. Nothing in this subparagraph 26        shall restrict unpaid services provided as part of the   HB2555- 10 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1        family caregiver's familial or household relationship 2        to the eligible relative. 3            (C) A family home health aide is not permitted to 4        provide tracheostomy and ventilation therapy and care 5        regardless of the clinical acuity of the eligible 6        relative. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a 7        family home health aide who is a clinical nursing 8        specialist, a registered nurse, a registered nurse 9        practitioner, licensed practical nurse, or licensed 10        vocational nurse licensed in this State from providing 11        tracheostomy, ventilation therapy, and qualified home 12        health aide services to an eligible relative. 13            (D) A family home health aide shall not provide 14        qualified home health aide services to an eligible 15        relative unless the plan of care for the eligible 16        relative is recertified by the provider at least every 17        180 calendar days.18    (d) Triaging services based on acuity. To ensure 19continuity of care, the Department must ensure the following:20        (1) an eligible relative receiving qualified home 21    health aide services, who is also eligible for home health 22    and private duty nursing services, remains eligible and 23    enrolled in such programs regardless of clinical acuity, 24    as may be determined utilizing the optional State acuity 25    tool described in subsection (e) or in a manner described 26    by the Department;   HB2555- 11 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1        (2) an eligible relative requiring a higher clinical 2    acuity of care, including those who require tracheostomy 3    and ventilation therapy and care, have timely access to 4    private duty nursing services; and5        (3) the home care provider employing the family home 6    health aide be given preference to provide any other 7    necessary home health and private duty nursing services to 8    the eligible relative, beyond those provided as part of 9    the Family Home Health Aide Program, to the extent 10    practicable.11    (e) Optional clinical acuity tool.12        (1) In general. The Department may develop a State 13    clinical acuity tool to assist in determining the care 14    needs of medically fragile individuals to ensure that such 15    individuals receive access to high-quality, clinically 16    appropriate home health services, private duty nursing 17    services, and qualified family home health aide services. 18    If the Department develops such a clinical acuity tool, 19    the Department shall convene a working group that includes 20    representatives of independent and national home care 21    providers of private duty nursing services under the 22    State's Medicaid program, other private duty nursing 23    agencies, full-benefit dual eligible individuals, Medicaid 24    beneficiaries, patient advocacy groups, and other relevant 25    stakeholders to assist the Department in developing such a 26    clinical acuity tool to determine the appropriate level of   HB2555- 12 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1    care for medically fragile individuals, including eligible 2    relatives. 3        (2) Use of optional clinical acuity tool. The 4    Department may create a program to require the use of the 5    State clinical acuity tool described in subparagraph (A) 6    to conduct an assessment to determine whether the services 7    described under subsection (c) are clinically appropriate 8    for such medically fragile individuals and eligible 9    relatives consistent with their plan of care prior to the 10    provision of such services. Under such program, the 11    Department shall ensure that the assessment conducted 12    using the State clinical acuity tool is independent and 13    not conducted by a home health agency or facility.14    (f) Respite program. In developing the Family Home Health 15Aid Program, the Department shall establish a respite program 16to provide respite care for family home health aides, private 17duty nurses, and home health aides. To ensure continuity of 18high quality of care, the Department shall ensure that the 19respite program:20        (1) is operated and managed by the same home care 21    provider that employs the family home health aide as 22    described in subsection (b); and23        (2) provides respite hours in totality on a biannual 24    or annual basis.25    (g) Reimbursement. In consultation with representatives of 26independent and State providers of private duty nursing   HB2555- 13 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1services under the State's Medicaid program, other private 2duty nursing agencies, home care providers, patient advocacy 3groups, and other relevant stakeholders, the Department shall 4establish a payment rate to reimburse home care providers for 5the provision of qualified home health aide services that are 6adequate to provide efficient, economical, and effective 7administration of the Family Home Health Aide Program and 8Illinois' Medicaid State Plan. In establishing such a rate, 9the Department shall ensure:10        (1) compliance with State and federal minimum wage 11    requirements; 12        (2) when establishing such payment rates, that the 13    rates take into consideration any clinical supervision 14    that home health agencies or private duty nursing 15    providers must provide to family home health aides in the 16    provision of qualified home health aide services to 17    eligible relatives; and18        (3) that payment rates are not set at a level that 19    would deter individuals from pursuing other opportunities 20    in alternate clinical care settings. 21     (h) Electronic visit verification. The Department shall 22require family home health aides providing qualified home 23health aide services under the State's Medicaid program to 24utilize the State's electronic visit verification system 25established in accordance with federal law.26     (i) Reporting requirements. To track clinical outcomes   HB2555- 14 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1and operational challenges with the Family Home Health Aide 2Program, the Department shall issue, within 2 years after the 3establishment of the program, and every 2 years thereafter, a 4report to the Governor and make such report publicly available 5on the Department's official website. The report shall include 6the following:7        (1) the number of hospitalizations and emergency room 8    visits of eligible relatives participating in the program;9        (2) the number of private duty nursing hours each 10    eligible relative participating in the program has 11    received and an analysis of whether such hours have 12    increased or decreased since the eligible relative's 13    participation the program;14        (3) the number of qualified home health aide services 15    that were provided by family home health aides to each 16    eligible relative enrolled in the program; 17        (4) the number of overpayments made to each provider 18    employing family home health aides and other metrics 19    determined by the State that may be used to determine the 20    amount of fraud, waste, and abuse in the program; and21        (5) an analysis of whether the State's waitlist for 22    private duty nursing services or other home and 23    community-based services under the State's Medicaid 24    program has improved or declined since the introduction of 25    the Family Home Health Aide Program.26     (j) Rulemaking. The Department may adopt rules to   HB2555- 15 -LRB104 09368 KTG 19427 b1implement this Act.